CIK: 1196298
Company Name: NEPHROS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2020-02-27
Accession Number: 0001493152-20-003069


Item 1 Business Overview Nephros, Inc. (the Company or we ) is a commercial stage company that develops and sells high performance water solutions to the medical and commercial markets. In medical markets, we sell water filters and water pathogen detection products. Our water filters, generally classified as ultrafilters, are used primarily by hospitals for the prevention of infection from waterborne pathogens, such as legi1lla and pseudomonas, and in dialysis centers for the removal of biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate. Because our ultrafilters capture contaminants as small as 0.005 microns in size, they minimize exposure to a wide variety of bacteria, viruses, fungi, parasites, and endotoxins. Our pathogen detection system is a portable, real time system designed to provide actionable data for infection control teams on up to 15 different pathogens from a single water sample, in approximately 1 hour. In commercial markets, we manufacture and sell water filters that improve the taste and odor of water and reduce biofilm, bacteria, and scale build up in downstream equipment. Marketed under both the Nephros and AETHER brands, our products are used in the health care, food service, hospitality, and convenience store markets. The AETHER brand was acquired on December 31, 2018, when we entered into a Membership Interest Purchase Agreement (the Agreement ) with Biocon 1, LLC and Aether Water Systems, LLC (collectively, Aether ), and Gregory Lucas, the sole member of Aether. Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement, we acquired 100% of the outstanding membership interests of Aether (the Aether Acquisition, which we have also previously referred to as the Biocon Acquisition ). We also have a subsidiary, Specialty Renal Products, Inc. ( SRP ), a development stage medical device company, focused primarily on developing hemodiafiltration ( HDF ) technology. SRP is developing a second generation of the Nephros OLp r H2H Hemodiafiltration System, the FDA 510(k) cleared medical device that enables nephrologists to provide HDF treatment to patients with end stage renal disease ( ESRD ). We were founded in 1997 by healthcare professionals affiliated with Columbia University Medical Center New York Presbyterian Hospital to develop and commercialize an alternative method to hemodialysis. We have extended our filtration technologies to meet the demand for liquid purification in other areas, in particular, water purification. Reverse Stock Split On July 9, 2019, we effected a reverse stock split, in which every nine shares of our common stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the effective time, which was 530 p.m. ET on July 9, 2019, were combined into 1 share of common stock. Fractional shares were not issued and stockholders who otherwise would have been entitled to receive a fractional share as a result of the reverse stock split received an amount in cash equal to $5.58 per share for such fractional interests. The number of shares of our common stock issued and outstanding was reduced from approximately 69,000,000 to approximately 7,700,000. All of the share and per share amounts discussed in this Annual Report on Form 10 K have been adjusted to reflect the effect of this reverse split. Public Offering On January 31, 2020, we announced the sale of 937,500 shares of common stock through a confidentially marketed underwritten public offering at a price of $8.00 per share. The transaction closed on February 4, 2020 with aggregate proceeds of $7,500,000 and net proceeds after underwriting discounts and offering expenses of approximately $6,765,000. The shares were offered pursuant to an effective shelf registration statement on Form S 3 (File No. 333 234528) that was previously filed with the SEC and declared effective on December 6, 2019. 3 Our Products Water Filtration Products We develop and sell water filtration products used in both medical and commercial applications. Our water filtration products employ multiple filtration technologies, as described below. In medical markets, our primary filtration mechanism is to pass liquids through the pores of polysulf1 hollow fiber. Our filters pores are significantly smaller than those of competing products, resulting in highly effective elimination of waterborne pathogens, including legi1lla bacteria (the cause of Legionnaires disease) and viruses, which are not eliminated by most other microbiological filters on the market. Additionally, the fiber structure and pore density in our hollow fiber enables significantly higher flow rates than in other polysulf1 hollow fiber. Our primary sales strategy in medical markets is to sell through value added resellers ( VARs ). Leveraging VARs has enabled us to expand rapidly our access to target customers without significant sales staff expansion. In addition, while we are currently focused in medical markets, the VARs that support these customers also support a wide variety of commercial and industrial customers. We believe that our VAR relationships will facilitate growth in filter sales outside of the medical industry. In commercial markets, we develop and sell our AETHER branded filters, for which carbon based absorption is the primary filtration mechanism. Aether products allow us to improve water odor and taste, to reduce scale and heavy metals, and to reduce other water contaminants for customers who are primarily in the food service, convenience store, and hospitality industries. Our Aether filter offerings have the potential to generate accretive revenue growth in at least 3 ways. First, we expect the business to continue its organic growth. Second, cross selling opportunities are generated by offering taste odor focused products to the medical markets, as well as pathogen focused filtration to the commercial markets. Finally, as part of the more substantial Nephros organization, Aether may be able to compete for larger filtration contracts than may have been available to it as a smaller, independent firm. In the year since we acquired the AETHER brand, we have seen some promising results in each of these strategies, but it is still too early to judge the likelihood or magnitude of their long term success. In commercial markets, our model combines both direct and indirect sales. Our sales staff have sold products directly to a number of convenience stores, hotels, casinos, and restaurants. We are also pursuing large corporate contracts through partnerships. Target Markets Our ultrafiltration products currently target the following markets Hospitals and Other Healthcare Facilities Filtration of water for washing and drinking as an aid in infection control. The filters produce water that is suitable for wound cleansing, cleaning of equipment used in medical procedures, and washing of surgeons hands. Dialysis Centers Filtration of water or bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis. Commercial Facilities Filtration and purification of water for consumption, including for use in ice machines and soft drink dispensers. Military and Outdoor Recreation Individual water purification devices used by soldiers and backpackers to produce drinking water in the field, as well as filters customized to remote water processing systems. 4 Hospitals and Other Healthcare Facilities. Nephros filters are a leading tool used to provide proactive protection to patients in high risk areas (e.g., ice machines, surgical rooms, NICUs) and reactive protection to patients in broader areas during periods of water pathogen outbreaks. Our products are used in hundreds of medical facilities to aid in infection control, both proactively and reactively. According to the American Hospital Association, approximately 6,200 hospitals, with approximately 931,000 beds, treated over 36 million patients in the United States in 2017. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention estimates that healthcare associated infections ( HAI ) occurred in approximately 1 out of every 31 hospital patients, or about 687,000 patients in 2015. HAIs affect patients in hospitals or other healthcare facilities and are not present or incubating at the time of admission. They also include infections acquired by patients in the hospital or facility, but appearing after discharge, and occupational infections among staff. Many HAIs are caused by waterborne bacteria and viruses that can thrive in aging or complex plumbing systems often found in healthcare facilities. In June 2017, the Center for Clinical Standards and Quality at the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services ( CMS ) announced the addition of requirements for facilities to develop policies and procedures that inhibit the growth and spread of legi1lla and other opportunistic pathogens in building water systems. Going forward, CMS surveyors will review policies, procedures, and reports documenting water management implementation results to verify that facilities are compliant with these requirements. We believe that these CMS regulations may have a positive impact on the sale of our HAI inhibiting ultrafilters. We currently have FDA 510(k) clearance on the following portfolio of medical device products for use in the hospital setting to aid in infection control The DSU H and SSU H are in line, 0.005 micron ultrafilters that provide dual and single stage protection, respectively, from waterborne pathogens. They are primarily used to filter potable water feeding ice machines, sinks, and medical equipment, such as endoscope washers and surgical room humidifiers. The DSU H has an up to 6 month product life in a typical hospital setting, while the SSU H has an up to 3 month life. The S100 is a point of use, 0.01 micron microfilter that provides protection from waterborne pathogens. The S100 is primarily used to filter potable water feeding sinks and showers. The S100 has an up to 3 month product life when used in a hospital setting. The HydraGuard TM and HydraGuard TM Flush are 0.005 micron cartridge ultrafilters that provide single stage protection from waterborne pathogens. The HydraGuard ultrafilters are primarily used to filter potable water feeding ice machines and medical equipment, such as endoscope washers and surgical room humidifiers. The HydraGuard has an up to 6 month product life and the HydraGuard Flush has an up to 12 month product life when used in a hospital setting. Our complete hospital infection control product line, including in line, point of use, and cartridge filters, can be viewed on our website at http www.nephros.com infection control . We are not including the information on our website as a part of, nor incorporating it by reference into, this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Dialysis Centers Water Bicarbonate . In the dialysis water market, Nephros ultrafiltration products are among the highest performing products on the market. The DSU D, SSU D and the SSUmini have become the standard endotoxin filter in many portable reverse osmosis systems. The EndoPur , our large format ultrafilter targeted at dialysis clinic water systems, provides the smallest pore size available. Following a long pilot project at a major dialysis provider, we are now seeing growth in the use of this product. In addition, we aim to expand EndoPur usage into heat disinfected water systems, which will further open the market for this product. To perform hemodialysis, all dialysis clinics have dedicated water purification systems to produce water and bicarbonate concentrate, 2 essential ingredients for making dialysate, the liquid that removes waste material from the blood. According to the American Journal of Kidney Diseases, there are approximately 6,500 dialysis clinics in the United States servicing approximately 468,000 patients annually. We estimate that there are over 100,000 hemodialysis machines in operation in the United States. 5 Medicare is the main payer for dialysis treatment in the United States. To be eligible for Medicare reimbursement, dialysis centers must meet the minimum standards for water and bicarbonate concentrate quality set by the Association for the Advancement of Medical Instrumentation ( AAMI ), the American National Standards Institute ( ANSI ) and the International Standards Organization ( ISO ). We anticipate that the stricter standards approved by these organizations in 2009 will be adopted by Medicare in the near future. We currently have FDA 510(k) clearance on the following portfolio of medical device products for use in the dialysis setting to aid in bacteria, virus, and endotoxin retention The DSU D, SSU D and SSUmini are in line, 0.005 micron ultrafilters that provide protection from bacteria, viruses, and endotoxins. All of these products have an up to 12 month product life in the dialysis setting and are used to filter water following treatment with a reverse osmosis ( RO ) system, and to filter bicarbonate concentrate. These ultrafilters are primarily used in the water lines and bicarbonate concentrate lines leading into dialysis machines, and as a polish filter for portable RO machines. The EndoPur is a 0.005 micron cartridge ultrafilter that provides single stage protection from bacteria, viruses, and endotoxins. The EndoPur has an up to 12 month product life in the dialysis setting, and is used to filter water following treatment with an RO system. More specifically, the EndoPur is used primarily to filter water in large RO systems designed to provide ultrapure water to an entire dialysis clinic. The EndoPur is a cartridge based, plug and play market entry that requires no plumbing at installation or replacement. The EndoPur is available in 10 , 20 , and 30 configurations. Commercial and Industrial Facilities . Our commercial NanoGuard product line accomplishes ultrafiltration via small pore size (0.005 micron) technology, filtering bacteria and viruses from water. In addition, the recently acquired AETHER brand expands our product line to include water filtration and purification technologies that are primarily focused on improving odor and taste and on reducing scale and heavy metals from filtered water. We purchased the AETHER brand to expedite our access to commercial markets and to expand our filtration expertise and capabilities. Our commercial market focus is in the hotel, restaurant, and convenience store markets. In the first year post acquisition, we upgraded Aether facilities to increase production and logistics capacity, integrated Aether products into the Nephros infection control product portfolio, and initiated sales efforts with a number of large commercial customers. We have recently added to our commercial sales team and, going forward, hope to close on 1 or more large contracts that may result in step change increases in commercial market revenue. Over time, we believe that the same water safety management programs currently underway at medical facilities may migrate to commercial markets. As the epidemiology of waterborne pathogens expands, links to contamination sources will become more efficient and the data more readily available. In cases where those sources are linked to restaurants, hotels, office buildings and residential complexes, the corporate owners of those facilities will likely face increasing liability exposure. We expect that building owners will come to understand ASHRAE 188, which outlines risk factors for buildings and their occupants, and provides water safety management guidelines. We believe, in time, most commercial buildings will need to follow the basic requirements of ASHRAE 188 create a water management plan, perform routine testing, and establish a plan to treat the building in the event of a positive test. As demand for water testing and microbiological filtration grows, we will be ready to deploy our expertise and solutions based on years of experience servicing the medical market. We believe that we have an opportunity to offer unique expertise and products to the commercial market, and that our future revenue from the commercial market could even surpass our infection control revenue. We currently market the following portfolio of proprietary products for use in the commercial, industrial, and food service settings The NanoGuard set of products are in line, 0.005 micron ultrafilter that provides dual stage retention of any organic or inorganic particle larger than 15,000 Daltons. NanoGuard products are designed to fit a variety of existing plumbing configurations, including 10 and 20 standard housings, and AETHER and Everpure manifolds. Included in the NanoGuard product line are both conventional and flushable filters. 6 The AETHER line of commercial filters, which are also sold under the Nephros brand, provide a variety of technology solutions that improve water quality in food service, convenience store, hospitality, and industrial applications. AETHER filters improve water taste and odor, and reduce sediment, dirt, rust particles and other solids, chlorine and heavy minerals, lime scale build up, and both particulate lead and soluble lead. AETHER products combine effectively with NanoGuard ultrafiltration technologies to offer full featured solutions to the commercial water market, including to existing users of Everpure filter manifolds. Military and Outdoor Recreation . We developed our individual water treatment device ( IWTD ) in both in line and point of use configurations. Our IWTD allows a soldier in the field to derive drinking water from any freshwater source. This enables the soldier to remain hydrated, to help maintain mission effectiveness and unit readiness, and to extend mission reach. Our IWTD has been validated by the military to meet the NSF Protocol P248 standard. It has also been approved by the U.S. Army Public Health Command and the U.S. Army Test and Evaluation Command for deployment. In May 2015, we entered into a Sublicense Agreement (the Sublicense Agreement ) with CamelBak Products, LLC ( CamelBak ). Under this Sublicense Agreement, we granted CamelBak an exclusive, non transferable, worldwide (with the exception of Italy) sublicense and license, in each case solely to market, sell, distribute, import and export the IWTD. In exchange for the rights granted to CamelBak, CamelBak agreed, through December 31, 2022, to pay us a percentage of the gross profit on any sales made to a branch of the U.S. military, subject to certain exceptions, and to pay us a fixed per unit fee for any other sales made. CamelBak was also required to meet or exceed certain minimum annual fees payable to us, and, if such fees are not met or exceeded, we were able to convert the exclusive sublicense to a non exclusive sublicense with respect to non U.S. military sales. In the first quarter of 2019, the Sublicense Agreement was amended to eliminate the minimum fee obligations starting May 6, 2018 and, as such, Camelbak has no further minimum fee obligations. During the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we recognized royalty revenue of approximately $16,000 and $100,000, respectively, related to this Sublicense Agreement. CamelBak product sales have been slower than originally hoped. However, military contracts often take years to close, and we remain optimistic about these products and markets. Pathogen Detection Systems Pathogen Detection in Infection Control . We recently expanded our portfolio of solutions with the introduction of our PluraPath pathogen detection system, which we believe represents a significant growth opportunity for Nephros. We developed the PluraPath pathogen detection system to provide real time data to infection control teams executing their water management plans. We integrated our ultrafilter technology with emerging, quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) technology and real time analytics. We chose a portable, open source qPCR platform that allows us to parallel processes up to 15 different bacteria and virus assays. We worked with industry experts to select and develop DNA and RNA based assays that could meet our goals of providing quantitative precision within 1 hour. We also developed a mobile application to extract and process the data real time. Furthermore, we designed the system so that any1 can perform qPCR testing, not just some1 with training in microbiological laboratory techniques. With the PluraPath system, it will be possible to map and track the changes to levels of multiple bacterial and viral pathogens in a building water system on a real time basis, at cost levels equivalent to assays that currently take 24 72 hours or more and typically provide data on only a single pathogen. Using PluraPath, we expect that infection control teams will be able to quickly assess approximate levels of a broad array of pathogens in their water systems, and optimally focus their secondary disinfection efforts and point of use filtration; services and products offered by our strategic partners. The PluraPath system does not replace culture based assays, which are the current regulatory requirements for confirmation in testing for waterborne pathogens. Rather, we believe PluraPath will become a valuable tool in the arsenal of defense, permitting faster decision making about a larger target population of pathogens. Our objective is to provide our customers and strategic partners with a user friendly system that delivers dependable, actionable data to infection control teams in less than an hour. 7 Pathogen Detection in Dialysis Facilities. We have also been investigating pathogen detection efforts in the dialysis space. The LAL (limulus amebocyte lysate) test is a dialysis industry standard assay that identifies the presence of potential endotoxins, agnostic to the source species. The source of endotoxins are gram negative bacteria. LAL testing routinely takes 48 72 hours to provide results from the time of shipping the sample to a central laboratory. When dialysis clinics have urgent contamination or severely elevated endotoxin issues, they may have to shut down for extended periods of time creating enormous logistical issues for patients and increasing the cost of care. To provide a real time solution for this testing paradigm, we plan to launch the DialyPath pathogen detection and endotoxin estimation system in the second quarter of this year. The DialyPath system will mirror our PluraPath but include a gram negative DNA marker test and test for six different gram negative bacteria. The DialyPath system is designed to provide data on 2 test samples in 1 run in less than 1 hour. The system will provide an estimate of the overall endotoxin in the sample, as well as estimated levels of six specific endotoxin generating bacteria known to be frequent invaders of dialysis clinic water systems. Facility Wide Pathogen Detection. Bacterial contaminants in water systems can originate from thousands of different bacterial families. The technology now exists to map the water system biome in real time, on site. Using an enhanced form of the portable PluraPath system and a bioinformatics database, we have been able to detect as many as 10 different bacteria families in a single sample. The potential for this kind of building biome mapping is enormous. We will have the ability to process as many as 96 samples in a single run, recognizing over 20,000 different bacteria reference sequences, in less than a day on site. We are currently working on the processes and procedures to provide this as a service, and eventually as a product that we can support with partners who have the in house technical capabilities to manage this system. Additionally, we are working on drafting a white paper to provide guidance on how to operationalize this building biome mapping tool. We expect to be able to launch the SequaPath system and building biome mapping service before the end of 2020. While this service could be of value to the management of any water system in any building in any part of the world, we will first focus on the hospital customers of our strategic partners. Once proven in the hospital space, then we believe that the SequaPath system has the potential to shift the building water testing paradigm across multiple markets and geographies. Specialty Renal Products HDF System Introduction to HDF The current standard of care in the United States for patients with chronic renal failure is hemodialysis ( HD ), a process in which toxins are cleared via diffusion. Patients typically receive HD treatments at least 3 times weekly for 3 4 hours per treatment. HD is most effective in removing smaller, easily diffusible toxins. For patients with acute renal failure, the current standard of care in the United States is hemofiltration ( HF ), a process where toxins are cleared via convection. HF offers a much better removal of larger sized toxins when compared to HD; however, HF treatment is more challenging for patients, as it is performed on a daily basis, and typically takes 12 24 hours per treatment. Hemodiafiltration ( HDF ) is an alternative dialysis modality that combines the benefits of HD and HF into a single therapy by clearing toxins using both diffusion and convection. Though not widely used in the United States, HDF is prevalent in Europe and is performed for a growing number of patients. Clinical experience and literature show the following clinical and patient benefits of HDF Enhanced clearance of middle and large molecular weight toxins Improved survival up to a 35% reduction in mortality risk Reduction in the occurrence of dialysis related amyloidosis Reduction in inflammation Reduction in medication such as EPO and phosphate binders Improved patient quality of life Reduction in number of hospitalizations and overall length of stay 8 However, like HD, HDF can be resource intensive and can require a significant amount of time to deliver 1 course of treatment. Nephros HDF Background Over the course of our history, we originally developed a medical device that enabled a standard HD machine to perform HDF. We refer to our approach as an on line mid dilution hemodiafiltration ( mid dilution HDF ) system. Our original solution included an OLp r H2H Hemodiafiltration Module ( H2H Module ), an OLp r MD 220 Hemodiafilter ( HDF Filter ) and an H2H Substitution Filter ( Dialysate Filter ). Our H2H Module attaches to a standard HD machine to perform on line HDF therapy. The HD machine controls and monitors the basic treatment functions, as it would normally when providing HD therapy. The H2H Module is a free standing, movable device that is placed next to either side of an HD machine. The H2H Module connects to the clinic water supply, drain, and electricity. The H2H Module utilizes the HDF Filter, and is very similar to a typical hollow fiber dialyzer assembled with a single hollow fiber bundle made with a high flux (or high permeability) membrane. The fiber bundle is separated into 2 discrete, but serially connected, blood paths. Dialysate flows in 1 direction that is counter current to blood flow in Stage 1 and co current to blood flow in Stage 2 In addition to the HDF Filter, the H2H Module also utilizes a Dialysate Filter during patient treatment. The Dialysate Filter is a hollow fiber, ultrafilter device that consists of 2 sequential (redundant) ultrafiltration stages in a single housing. During on line HDF with the H2H Module, fresh dialysate is redirected by the H2H Module hydraulic (substitution) pump and passed through this dual stage ultrafilter before being infused as substitution fluid into the extracorporeal circuit. Providing ultrapure dialysate is crucial for the success of on line HDF treatment. Our original HDF system conformed with current ANSI AAMI ISO standards and was cleared by the FDA for the treatment of patients with chronic renal failure in 2012 To date, our HDF System is the only HDF system cleared by the FDA. Over the last four years, DaVita Healthcare Partners, the Renal Research Institute (a research division of Fresenius Medical Care), and Vanderbilt University conducted post market evaluations of our hemodiafiltration system in their clinics. We gathered direct feedback from these evaluations to develop a better understanding of how our system best fits into the current clinical and economic ESRD treatment paradigm. The ultimate goal of the evaluations was to better understand the potential for HDF in the U.S. clinical setting in order to (a) improve the quality of life for the patient, (b) reduce overall expenditure compared to other dialysis modalities, (c) minimize the impact on nurse work flow at the clinic, and (d) demonstrate the pharmacoeconomic benefit of the HDF technology to the U.S. healthcare system, as has been d1 in Europe with other HDF systems. The last evaluation was concluded at Vanderbilt in the first quarter of 2018. Specialty Renal Products, Inc. Over the past 2 years, we have dramatically simplified and redesigned our HDF device. Our updates have made the system significantly easier to use. By shifting from a reusable substitution ultrafilter to a disposable substitution ultrafilter, we were able to simplify the set up process and substantially reduce the time required between patient treatments 2 of the key complaints from our first generation system. We used real time user feedback to aid in the fine tuning of our changes to the system that impacted usability. We believe our second generation HDF system will meet the needs of both clinicians and patients. In 2018, we spun off the development of the HDF device into SRP. We raised $3 million of outside capital directly into SRP to fund the second generation development described above. Nephros maintains a 625% ownership stake in SRP. 9 Once we have obtained FDA clearance for our second generation device, we intend to launch it at a clinic with previous experience with our device. We plan to then expand our efforts, on a measured basis, to clinics that wish to provide HDF therapy to their patients. At this time, we do not believe making a rapid and broad push into the market would be optimal. Nephrologists in the United States. are not trained on HDF therapy; however, many nephrologists want to explore the option and we believe that early adopters will want to perform studies to better understand the technology. We intend to support these investigator initiated studies. While a number of studies have been performed in Europe, the body of evidence for optimal use of HDF needs to be built in the U.S. treatment setting. According to European data from Fresenius, over 15% of dialysis treatments are HDF. That could translate to over 10 million individual treatments if HDF achieved that level of penetration in the United States. We do not believe that the United States will instantaneously mirror Europe. However, we do believe that HDF therapy has a place in the treatment landscape for patients with ESRD in the United States, and we look forward to enabling this pathway. Corporate Information We were incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware in April 1997. Our principal executive offices are located at 380 Lackawanna Place, South Orange, New Jersey 07079, and our teleph1 number is (201) 343 5202 We also have offices in Las Vegas, Nevada; Nashville, Tennessee; and Dublin, Ireland. For more information about Nephros, please visit our website at www.nephros.com . Manufacturing and Suppliers We do not, and do not intend to in the near future, manufacture any of our medical device products and comp1nts. We do manufacture some of our commercial products in our Aether facility in Las Vegas, Nevada. With regard to the OLp r MD190 and MD220, on June 27, 2011, we entered into a License Agreement (the License Agreement ), effective July 1, 2011, as amended by the first amendment dated February 19, 2014, with Bellco S.r.l. ( Bellco ), an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of our patented mid dilution dialysis filters. Under the License Agreement, as amended, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the covered products under its own name, label, and CE mark in certain countries on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in certain other countries. On April 23, 2012, we entered into a License and Supply Agreement (the License and Supply Agreement ) with Medica S.p.A. ( Medica ), an Italy based medical product manufacturing company, for the marketing and sale of certain filtration products based upon Medica proprietary Medisulf1 ultrafiltration technology in conjunction with our filtration products, and for an exclusive supply arrangement for the filtration products. Under the License and Supply Agreement, as amended, Medica granted to us an exclusive license, with right of sublicense, to market, promote, distribute, offer for sale and sell the filtration products worldwide, with certain limitations on territory, during the term of the License and Supply Agreement. In addition, we granted to Medica an exclusive license under our intellectual property to make the filtration products during the term of the License and Supply Agreement. The filtration covered under the License and Supply Agreement include both certain products based on Medica proprietary Versatile microfiber technology and certain filtration products based on Medica proprietary Medisulf1 ultrafiltration technology. The term of the License and Supply Agreement with Medica expires on December 31, 2025, unless earlier terminated by either party in accordance with the terms of the License and Supply Agreement. In exchange for the rights granted, we agreed to make minimum annual aggregate purchases from Medica throughout the term of the License and Supply Agreement. As part of the License and Supply Agreement, we granted to Medica 300,000 options to purchase our common stock, which vested over the first 3 years of the agreement. We currently have an understanding with Medica whereby we have agreed to pay interest to Medica at a 12% annual rate calculated on the principal amount of any outstanding invoices that are not paid pursuant to the original payment terms. Sales and Marketing Under the Bellco License Agreement, as discussed above, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the covered products under its own name, label and CE mark in the territory, as defined in the License Agreement. In addition, if requested by us, Bellco will be required to sell the covered products to our distributors in the stated territory. 10 Our New Jersey headquarters oversees global sales and marketing activity of our ultrafilter products. We work with multiple distributors for our ultrafilter products in the hospital and dialysis water markets. For the food service and hospitality markets, our Aether division leads global sales and marketing activity. For other prospective markets for our ultrafilter products, we are pursuing alliance opportunities for joint product development and or distribution. Our ultrafilter manufacturer in Europe shares certain intellectual property rights with us for 1 of our dual stage ultrafilter designs. Research and Development Our research and development efforts continue on several fronts directly related to our current product lines. For the ultrafiltration systems business, we are continually working with existing and potential distributors of ultrafilter products to develop solutions to meet customer needs. Our pathogen detection systems organization is driving the development of PluraPath and other related systems planned for the future. Our SRP subsidiary is driving the development of our second generation HDF system. Major Customers For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, the following customers accounted for the following percentages of our revenues, respectively Customer 2019 2018 A 19 % 6 % B 17 % 11 % C 10 % % D 10 % 10 % E 4 % 11 % Total 60 % 38 % Due primarily to the success of 2 significant customer relationships (Customers A and B), concentration levels at our top five customers increased compared to 2018. We expect these 2 relationships to continue to grow, but that overall concentration levels will remain relatively stable, due to the expected growth of other customer relationships. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the following customers accounted for the following percentages of our accounts receivable, respectively Customer 2019 2018 A 26 % 5 % B 11 % 1 % E 6 % 11 % F % 15 % D % 11 % Total 43 % 43 % Competition With respect to the water filtration market, we compete with companies that are well entrenched in the water filtration domain. These companies include Pall Corporation (now wholly owned by Danaher Corporation), which manufactures point of use microfiltration products, as well as 3M and Pentair, who manufacture the Cuno and Everpure brands of water filtration and purification products respectively. Our methods of competition in the water filtration domain include developing and marketing products that are designed to meet critical and specific customer needs more effectively than competitive devices; offering unique attributes that illustrate our product reliability, user friendliness, and performance capabilities; selling products to specific customer groups where our unique product attributes are mission critical; and pursuing alliance and or acquisition opportunities for joint product development and distribution. 11 The PluraPath pathogen detection system will compete in the $8 billion global water testing market. Portable, real time water testing, however, is a relatively new market, with few competitors, including Spartan Bioscience. The dialyzer and renal replacement therapy market is subject to intense competition. Accordingly, our future success will depend on our ability to meet the clinical goals of nephrologists, improve patient outcomes and remain cost effective for payers. We also compete with other suppliers of ESRD therapies, supplies and services. These suppliers include Fresenius Medical Care AG and Baxter International, Inc., currently 2 of the primary machine manufacturers in hemodialysis. Fresenius Medical Care AG and Baxter International, Inc. also manufacture HDF machines that are not currently approved in the United States. The markets in which we sell our dialysis products are highly competitive. Our competitors in the sale of hemodialysis products include Baxter International Inc., Fresenius Medical Care AG, Asahi Kasei Medical Co. Ltd., B. Braun Melsungen AG, Nipro Medical Corporation Ltd., Nikkiso Co., Ltd., Terumo Medical Corporation and Toray Medical Co., Ltd. Other competitive considerations include pharmacological and technological advances in preventing the progression of ESRD in high risk patients, such as those with diabetes and hypertension, technological developments by others in the area of dialysis, the development of new medications designed to reduce the incidence of kidney transplant rejection, and progress in using kidneys harvested from genetically engineered animals as a source of transplants. We are not aware of any other companies using technology similar to ours in the treatment of ESRD. Our competition would increase, however, if companies that currently sell ESRD products, or new companies that enter the market, develop technology that is more efficient than ours. We believe that in order to become competitive in this market, we will need to develop and maintain competitive products and take and hold sufficient market share from our competitors. Therefore, we expect our methods of competing in the ESRD marketplace to include continuing our efforts to develop, manufacture, and sell products that, when compared to competitive products, perform more efficiently, and are available at prices that are acceptable to the market; displaying our products and providing associated literature at major industry trade shows in the United States; initiating discussions with dialysis clinic medical directors, as well as representatives of dialysis clinical chains, to develop interest in our products; pursuing alliance opportunities in certain territories for distribution of our products and possible alternative manufacturing facilities; and entering into license agreements similar to our License Agreement with Bellco to expand market share. Intellectual Property Patents We protect our technology and products through patents and patent applications. In addition to the United States, we also apply for patents in other jurisdictions, such as the European Patent Office, Canada and Japan, to the extent we deem appropriate. We have built a portfolio of patents and applications covering our products, including their hardware design and methods of hemodiafiltration. 12 We believe that our patent strategy will provide a competitive advantage in our target markets, but our patents may not be broad enough to cover our competitors products, and may be subject to invalidation claims. Our U.S. patents for the Method and Apparatus for Efficient Hemodiafiltration and for the Dual Stage Filtration Cartridge have claims that cover the OLp r MDHDF filter series and the method of hemodiafiltration employed in the operation of the products. Technological developments in ESRD therapy could reduce the value of our intellectual property. Any such reduction could be rapid and unanticipated. We have issued patents on our water filtration products and applications in process to cover various applications in residential, commercial, and remote environments. As of December 31, 2019, we had twelve U.S. patents, four Mexican patents, 1 South Korean patent, 2 Chinese patents, 2 French patents, 2 German patents, 1 Israeli patent, 2 Italian patents, 1 Spanish patent, 2 United Kingdom patents, 1 Canadian patent, 1 Swedish patent, and 1 patent in the Netherlands. In addition, we have 2 pending patent applications in the United States and 1 in Canada. Our pending patent applications relate to a range of filter technologies, including cartridge configurations, cartridge assembly, substitution fluid systems, and methods to enhance and ensure performance. Trademarks As of December 31, 2019, we secured registrations of the trademarks H2H, PATHOGUARD, NANOGUARD, NEPHROS HYDRAGUARD and OLp r in the European Union. In the United States, we secured trademark registrations for OLp r, HYDRAGUARD and NANOGUARD. We have also filed trademark applications for ENDOPUR, PLURAPATH, DIALYPATH, FILPATH and SEQUAPATH in the United States. Governmental Regulation The research and development, manufacturing, promotion, marketing and distribution of our ESRD therapy products in the United States, Europe and other regions of the world are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, including the FDA, the European Union and analogous agencies. United States The FDA regulates the manufacture and distribution of medical devices in the United States pursuant to the Food, Drug, and Cosmetics (FDC) Act. All of our ESRD therapy products are regulated in the United States as medical devices by the FDA under the FDC Act. Under the FDC Act, medical devices are classified in 1 of 3 classes, namely Class I, II or III, on the basis of the controls deemed necessary by the FDA to reasonably ensure their safety and effectiveness. Class I devices are medical devices for which general controls are deemed sufficient to ensure their safety and effectiveness. General controls include provisions related to (1) labeling, (2) producer registration, (3) defect notification, (4) records and reports and (5) quality service requirements ( QSR ). Class II devices are medical devices for which the general controls for the Class I devices are deemed not sufficient to ensure their safety and effectiveness and require special controls in addition to the general controls. Special controls include provisions related to (1) performance and design standards, (2) post market surveillance, (3) patient registries and (4) the use of FDA guidelines. Class III devices are the most regulated medical devices and are generally limited to devices that support or sustain human life or are of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health or present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury. Pre market approval by the FDA is the required process of scientific review to ensure the safety and effectiveness of Class III devices. Before a new medical device can be introduced to the market, Section 510(k) and Section 515 of the FDC Act require a manufacturer who intends to market a medical device to submit a premarket notification (Section 510(k) or a request for premarket approval (Section 515), to the FDA. A 510(k) clearance will be granted if the submitted information establishes that the proposed device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed Class I or Class II medical device or to a Class III medical device for which the FDA has not called for premarket approval under Section 515. The 510(k) clearance process is generally faster and simpler than the premarket approval process. 13 Premarket approval (PMA) is the FDA process of scientific and regulatory review to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of Class III medical devices. Class III devices are those that support or sustain human life, are of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health, or which present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury, or are new and present unknown safety or effectiveness issues or risks. PMA is the most stringent type of device marketing application required by the FDA. To gain approval, the manufacturer must present adequate scientific evidence to assure that the device is safe and effective for its intended use(s). For any devices cleared through the 510(k) clearance process, modifications or enhancements that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device or that constitute a major change to the intended use of the device will require a new 510(k) clearance submission. Accordingly, if we do obtain Section 510(k) clearance for any of our ESRD therapy and or filtration products, we will need to submit another Section 510(k) notification if we significantly affect that product safety or effectiveness through subsequent modifications or enhancements. All of our products have been cleared by the FDA as Class II devices, such as DSU Dual Stage UltraFilter In June 2009, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the DSU to be used to filter biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. SSU D DSU D Dual Stage UltraFilter In July 2011, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the SSU DSU to be used to filter water or bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. OLp r H2H Module and OLp r MD 220 Hemodiafilter In April 2012, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the OLp r H2H Module and OLp r MD 220 Hemodiafilter for use with a UF controlled hemodialysis machine that provides ultrapure dialysate in accordance with current ANSI AAMI ISO standards, for the treatment of patients with chronic renal failure in the United States. DSU H SSU H In October 2014, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the DSU H and SSU H ultrafilters to be used to filter EPA quality drinking water. The filters retain bacteria, viruses and endotoxin. By providing ultrapure water for patient washing and drinking, the filters aid in infection control. S100 Point of Use Filter In April 2016, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the S100 point of use filter to be used to filter EPA quality drinking water. The filters retain bacteria. By retaining bacteria in water for washing and drinking, the filter may aid in infection control. HydraGuard In December 2016, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the HydraGuard 10 ultrafilter intended to be used to filter EPA quality drinking water. The filter retains bacteria, viruses and endotoxin. By providing ultrapure water for patient washing and drinking, the filter aids in infection control. EndoPur In March 2017, we received FDA 510(k) clearance of the EndoPur ultrafilter intended to be used to filter water used in hemodialysis devices. It assists in providing hemodialysis quality water. The device is not a complete water treatment system but serves to remove biological contaminants. Therefore, it must be used in conjunction with other water treatment equipment (Reverse Osmosis, Deionization, etc.). The FDC Act requires that medical devices be manufactured in accordance with the FDA current QSR regulations which require, among other things, that the design and manufacturing processes be regulated and controlled by the use of written procedures; the ability to produce medical devices which meet the manufacturer specifications be validated by extensive and detailed testing of every aspect of the process; any deficiencies in the manufacturing process or in the products produced be investigated; detailed records be kept, and a corrective and preventative action plan be in place; and manufacturing facilities be subject to FDA inspection on a periodic basis to monitor compliance with QSR regulations. 14 In addition to the requirements described above, the FDC Act requires that all medical device manufacturers and distributors register with the FDA annually and provide the FDA with a list of those medical devices which they distribute commercially; information be provided to the FDA on death or serious injuries alleged to have been associated with the use of the products, as well as product malfunctions that would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; and certain medical devices not cleared with the FDA for marketing in the United States meet specific requirements before they are exported. We and our contract manufacturers are required to manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP) requirements set forth in the QSR. The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and it includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts or services, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing, and record keeping. The FDA evaluates compliance with the QSR through periodic unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. If the FDA believes that we or any of our contract manufacturers, or regulated suppliers, are not in compliance with these requirements, there may be a material adverse effect on our manufacturing operations, effecting our ability to sell. European Union The European Union began to harmonize national regulations comprehensively for the control of medical devices in member nation in 1993, when it adopted its Medical Devices Directive 93 42 EEC. The European Union directive applies to both the manufacturer quality assurance system and the product technical design and discusses the various ways to obtain approval of a device (dependent on device classification), how to properly CE mark a device, and how to place a device on the market. In 2017, the European Union (EU) adopted the EU Medical Device Regulation (Council Regulations 2017 745) which imposes stricter requirements for the marketing and sale of medical devices, including new quality system and post market surveillance requirements. The regulation has a 3 year implementation period to May 2020 and will replace the existing directives on medical devices in the EU. After May 2020, medical devices marketed in the EU will require certification according to these new requirements, except that devices with valid CE certificates, issued pursuant to the Medical Device Directive before May 2020, may be placed on the market until 2024. Complying with this new regulation will require us to incur significant costs and failure to meet the requirements of the regulation could adversely impact our business in the European Union and other countries that utilize or rely on European Union requirements for medical device registrations. As defined in Medical Devices Directive 93 42 EEC, the regulatory approach necessary to demonstrate to the European Union that the organization has the ability to provide medical devices and related services that consistently meet customer requirements and regulatory requirements applicable to medical devices requires the certification of a full quality management system by a notified body. Initially, we engaged T V Rheinland of North America, Inc. ( T V Rheinland ) as the notified body to assist us in obtaining certification to ISO 13485 2003 standard, which demonstrates the presence of a quality management system that can be used by an organization for design and development, production, installation and servicing of medical devices and the design, development and provision of related services. European Union requirements for products are set forth in harmonized European Union standards and include conformity to safety requirements, physical and biological properties, construction and environmental properties, and information supplied by the manufacturer. A company demonstrates conformity to these requirements, with respect to a product, by pre clinical tests, biocompatibility tests, qualification of products and packaging, risk analysis and well conducted clinical investigations approved by ethics committees. 15 Once a manufacturer full quality management system is determined to be in compliance with ISO 13485 2003 and other statutory requirements, and the manufacturer products conform to harmonized European standards, the notified body will recommend and document such conformity. The manufacturer will receive a CE marking and ISO certifications, and then may place a CE mark on the relevant products. The CE mark, which stands for Conformit Europ ene, demonstrates compliance with the relevant European Union requirements. Products subject to these provisions that do not bear the CE mark cannot be imported to, or sold or distributed within, the European Union. Medical Devices sold in Europe anticipated to be sold in Europe, shall be examined and classified as Class I Provided non sterile or do not have a measuring functions; Low Risk Class I Provided sterile and or have a measuring function; Low medium risk Class IIa Medium risk Class IIb Medium high risk Class III High risk In July 2003, we received a certification from T V Rheinland that our quality management system conforms to the requirements of the European Community. At the same time, T V Rheinland approved our use of the CE marking with respect to the design and production of high permeability hemodialyzer products for ESRD therapy. In April 2010, we changed our notified body from T V Rheinland to BSI America, Inc. and expanded our scope to include design and development and production of water filters. Under the License Agreement with Bellco, as discussed above, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the covered products under its own name, label and CE mark in the stated territory. In addition, if requested by us, Bellco will be required to sell the covered products to our distributors in the stated territory. The following products have been certified by BSI America for CE marking and adherence to ISO13485 standards as Class IIa (Rule 3) medical devices SSU D DSU D Dual Stage Ultrafilter Intended to be used to filter water or bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. Regulatory Authorities in Regions Outside of the United States and the European Union In November 2007 and May 2011, the Therapeutic Products Directorate of Health Canada, the Canadian health regulatory agency, approved our OLp r MD220 Hemodiafilter and our DSU, respectively, for marketing in Canada. Other than the Canadian approval of our OLp r MD220 Hemodiafilter and DSU products, we have not obtained any regulatory approvals to sell any of our products outside of the United States and the European Union and there is no assurance that any such clearance or certification will be issued. Requirements pertaining to medical devices vary widely from country to country, ranging from no health regulations to detailed submissions such as those required by the FDA. Our manufacturing facilities are subject to audits and have been certified to be ISO 134852016 and Medical Device Directive 93 42 EEC, which allows us to sell our products in the United States, Canada and Europe. Currently we are in the process to seek approval for MDSAP compliance. The Medical Device Single Audit Program (MDSAP) is a program that allows the conduct of a single regulatory audit of a medical device manufacturer quality management system that satisfies the requirements of multiple regulatory jurisdictions. Audits are conducted by Auditing Organizations authorized by the participating Regulatory Authorities to audit under MDSAP requirements. The MDSAP is a way that medical device manufacturers can be audited once for compliance with the standard and regulatory requirements of up to five different medical device markets Australia, Brazil, Canada, Japan and the United States. Following the completion of MDSAP, this certification will allow us to sell our products in the United States, Canada, Europe, and other territories around the world, while maintaining our current approvals. The time and cost of obtaining new, and maintaining existing, market authorizations from countries outside of North America, and the requirements for licensing products in these countries may differ significantly from FDA requirements. 16 Reimbursement In both domestic markets and markets outside of the United States, sales of our ESRD therapy products will depend in part, on the availability of reimbursement from third party payers. In the United States, ESRD providers are reimbursed through Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers. In countries other than the United States, ESRD providers are also reimbursed through governmental insurers. In countries other than the United States, the pricing and profitability of our products generally will be subject to government controls. Despite the continually expanding influence of the European Union, national healthcare systems in its member nations, including reimbursement decision making, are neither regulated nor integrated at the European Union level. Each country has its own system, often closely protected by its corresponding national government. Product Liability and Insurance The production, marketing and sale of our products have an inherent risk of liability in the event of product failure or claim of harm caused by product operation. We have acquired product liability insurance for our products in the amount of $2 million. A successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage could materially deplete our assets. Moreover, any claim against us could generate negative publicity, which could decrease the demand for our products, our ability to generate revenues and our profitability. Some of our existing and potential agreements with manufacturers of our products and comp1nts of our products do or may require us (1) to obtain product liability insurance or (2) to indemnify manufacturers against liabilities resulting from the sale of our products. If we are not able to maintain adequate product liability insurance, we will be in breach of these agreements, which could materially adversely affect our ability to produce our products. Even if we are able to obtain and maintain product liability insurance, if a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage is made, then we may have to indemnify some or all of our manufacturers for their losses, which could materially deplete our assets. Employees As of December 31, 2019, we employed a total of 25 full time employees, including 8 employed in sales marketing customer support, 10 in general and administrative, and 7 in research and development. Available Information We are subject to the reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ). The Exchange Act requires us to file periodic reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC. The SEC maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. These materials may be obtained electronically by accessing the SEC website at http www.sec.gov . 17 Item 1A. Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Company We have a history of operating losses and a significant accumulated deficit, and we may not achieve or maintain profitability in the future. As of December 31, 2019, we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $127,332,000 as a result of historical operating losses. While we believe that the revenues following the launch of our new products will help us achieve profitability, there can be no guarantee of this. We may continue to incur additional losses in the future depending on the timing and marketplace acceptance of our products and as a result of operating expenses being higher than our gross margin from product sales. We began sales of our first product in March 2004, and we may never realize sufficient revenues from the sale of our products or be profitable. Each of the following factors, among others, may influence the timing and extent of our profitability, if any the market acceptance of our technologies and products in each of our target markets; our ability to effectively and efficiently manufacture, market and distribute our products; our ability to sell our products at competitive prices that exceed our per unit costs; and our ability to continue to develop products and maintain a competitive advantage in our industry. The recent coronavirus outbreak in Italy may impact our supply chain, which could adversely affect our sales and revenues if we are unable to obtain sufficient inventory of products. In December 2019, a novel strain of coronavirus was reported to have surfaced in Wuhan, China. As of February 2020, the virus has spread to Italy, which reportedly has the highest number of coronavirus infections outside Asia. We currently source substantially all of our products from Medica, which is located in Italy. As such, the outbreak of the coronavirus could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. These effects could include disruptions from the temporary closure of third party supplier and manufacturer facilities, or restrictions on the export or shipment of products. The extent to which the coronavirus impacts our results will depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted, including new information which may emerge concerning the severity of the coronavirus and the actions to contain the coronavirus or treat its impact, among others. If we violate any provisions of the FDC Act or any other statutes or regulations, then we could be subject to enforcement actions by the FDA or other governmental agencies. We face a significant compliance burden under the FDC Act and other applicable statutes and regulations which govern the testing, labeling, storage, record keeping, distribution, sale, marketing, advertising and promotion of our medically approved products. If we violate the FDC Act or other regulatory requirements (either with respect to our ultrafilters or otherwise) at any time during or after the product development and or approval process, we could be subject to enforcement actions by the FDA or other agencies, including fines; injunctions; civil penalties; recalls or seizures of products; total or partial suspension of the production of our products; withdrawal of any existing approvals or pre market clearances of our products; refusal to approve or clear new applications or notices relating to our products; recommendations that we not be allowed to enter into government contracts; and criminal prosecution. Any of the above could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our Aether Acquisition may not produce the desired outcomes and expected value. We purchased Aether to increase our revenues and to provide an entry to new markets, with particular focus on hospitality, food service, and convenience stores. However, any acquisition carries risks, including Issues of concern that were missed during due diligence activities; Sales to existing Aether customers may not increase as planned; Our target markets may be more difficult to grow than anticipated; Difficulties could emerge while integrating the 2 companies and their work forces; and Key employees could leave. As such, we cannot guarantee any specific results from the Aether Acquisition; and if the anticipated outcomes do not occur, our business, financial condition and results of operations may be materially impacted. 18 We cannot assure you that our products will be safe or that there will not be product related deaths, serious injuries or product malfunctions. Further, we are required under applicable law to report any circumstances relating to our medically approved products that could result in deaths or serious injuries. These circumstances could trigger recalls, class action lawsuits and other events that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from such products. We cannot assure you that our products will prove to be safe or that there will not be product related deaths or serious injuries or product malfunctions, which could trigger recalls, class action lawsuits and other events that could cause us to incur significant expenses, limit our ability to market our products and generate revenues from such products or cause us reputational harm. Under the FDC Act, we are required to submit medical device reports ( MDRs ) to the FDA to report device related deaths, serious injuries and malfunctions of medically approved products that could result in death or serious injury if they were to recur. Depending on their significance, MDRs could trigger events that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from such products. Additionally, any of the following could occur information contained in the MDRs could trigger FDA regulatory actions such as inspections, recalls and patient physician notifications; because the reports are publicly available, MDRs could become the basis for private lawsuits, including class actions; and if we fail to submit a required MDR to the FDA, the FDA could take enforcement action against us. If any of these events occur, then we could incur significant expenses and it could become more difficult for us to market and sell our products and to generate revenues from sales. Other countries may impose analogous reporting requirements that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from sales of our products. Product liability associated with the production, marketing and sale of our products, and or the expense of defending against claims of product liability, could materially deplete our assets and generate negative publicity which could impair our reputation. The production, marketing and sale of kidney dialysis and water filtration products have inherent risks of liability in the event of product failure or claim of harm caused by product operation. Voluntary recalls could subject us to claims or proceedings by consumers, the FDA or other regulatory authorities which may adversely impact our sales and revenues. Furthermore, even meritless claims of product liability may be costly to defend against. Although we have acquired product liability insurance for our products, we may not be able to maintain or obtain this insurance on acceptable terms or at all. Because we may not be able to obtain insurance that provides us with adequate protection against all potential product liability claims, a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage could materially deplete our assets. Moreover, even if we are able to obtain adequate insurance, any claim against us could generate negative publicity, which could impair our reputation and adversely affect the demand for our products, our ability to generate sales and our profitability. Some of the agreements that we may enter into with manufacturers of our products and comp1nts of our products may require us to obtain product liability insurance; or to indemnify manufacturers against liabilities resulting from the sale of our products. For example, the agreement with our contract manufacturer ( CM ) requires that we obtain and maintain certain minimum product liability insurance coverage and that we indemnify our CM against certain liabilities arising out of our products that they manufacture, provided they do not arise out of our CM breach of the agreement, negligence or willful misconduct. If we are not able to obtain and maintain adequate product liability insurance, then we could be in breach of these agreements, which could materially adversely affect our ability to produce our products and generate revenues. Even if we are able to obtain and maintain product liability insurance, if a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage is made, then we may have to indemnify some or all of our manufacturers for their losses, which could materially deplete our assets. 19 We face significant challenges in obtaining market acceptance of our products, which could adversely affect our potential sales and revenues. We do not yet have an established market or customer base for our products. Acceptance of our products in the marketplace by both potential users, including chronic renal failure patients, and potential purchasers, including nephrologists, dialysis clinics and other health care providers, is uncertain, and our failure to achieve sufficient market acceptance will significantly limit our ability to generate revenue and be profitable. Market acceptance will require substantial marketing efforts and the expenditure of significant funds by us to inform dialysis patients and nephrologists, dialysis clinics and other health care providers of the benefits of using our products. We may encounter significant clinical and market resistance to our products and our products may never achieve market acceptance. We may not be able to build key relationships with physicians, clinical groups and government agencies, pursue or increase sales opportunities in Europe or elsewhere, or be the first to introduce HDF therapy in the United States. Product orders may be cancelled, patients or customers currently using our products may cease to do so and patients or customers expected to begin using our products may not. Factors that may affect our ability to achieve acceptance of our chronic renal failure therapy products in the marketplace include whether such products will be safe for use; such products will be effective; such products will be cost effective; we will be able to demonstrate product safety, efficacy and cost effectiveness; there are unexpected side effects, complications or other safety issues associated with such products; and government or third party reimbursement for the cost of such products is available at reasonable rates, if at all. Acceptance of our water filtration products in the marketplace is also uncertain, and our failure to achieve sufficient market acceptance and sell such products at competitive prices will limit our ability to generate revenue and be profitable. Our water filtration products and technologies may not achieve expected reliability, performance and endurance standards. Our water filtration products and technologies may not achieve market acceptance, including among hospitals, or may not be deemed suitable for other commercial, military, industrial or retail applications. Many of the same factors that may affect our ability to achieve acceptance of our chronic renal failure therapy products in the marketplace will also apply to our water filtration products, except for those related to side effects, clinical trials and third party reimbursement. If we are not able to successfully scale up production of our products, then our sales and revenues will suffer. In order to commercialize our products, we need to be able to produce them in a cost effective way on a large scale to meet commercial demand, while maintaining extremely high standards for quality and reliability. The extent to which we fail to successfully commercialize our products will limit our ability to be profitable. We expect to rely on a limited number of independent manufacturers to produce our products. Our manufacturers systems and procedures may not be adequate to support our operations and may not be able to achieve the rapid execution necessary to exploit the market for our products. Our manufacturers could experience manufacturing and control problems as they begin to scale up our future manufacturing operations, if any, and we may not be able to scale up manufacturing in a timely manner or at a commercially reasonable cost to enable production in sufficient quantities. If we experience any of these problems with respect to our manufacturers initial or future scale ups of manufacturing operations, then we may not be able to have our products manufactured and delivered in a timely manner. Our products are new and evolving, and our manufacturers may encounter unforeseen difficulties in manufacturing them in commercial quantities or at all. If we cannot develop adequate distribution, customer service and technical support ne2rks, then we may not be able to market and distribute our products effectively and or customers may decide not to order our products. In either case, our sales and revenues will suffer. Our strategy requires us to distribute our products and provide a significant amount of customer service and maintenance and other technical service. To provide these services, we have begun, and will need to continue, to develop a ne2rk of distribution and a staff of employees and independent contractors in each of the areas in which we intend to operate. We cannot assure that we will be able to organize and manage this ne2rk on a cost effective basis. If we cannot effectively organize and manage this ne2rk, then it may be difficult for us to distribute our products and to provide competitive service and support to our customers, in which case customers may be unable, or decide not, to order our products and our sales and revenues will suffer. 20 We have limited experience selling our products to healthcare facilities, and we might be unsuccessful in increasing our sales. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to sell our products to hospitals and other healthcare facilities, including dialysis clinics. We have limited experience with respect to sales and marketing. If we are unsuccessful at manufacturing, marketing and selling our products, our operations and potential revenues will be materially adversely affected. We cannot sell our products, including certain modifications thereto, until we obtain the requisite regulatory approvals and clearances in the countries in which we intend to sell our products. If we fail to receive, or experience a significant delay in receiving, such approvals and clearances, then we may not be able to get our products to market and enhance our revenues. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to get our products into the market as quickly as possible. We have obtained a Conformit Europ ene ( CE ) mark, which demonstrates compliance with the relevant European Union requirements and is a regulatory prerequisite for selling our products in the European Union and certain other countries that recognize CE marking (collectively, European Community ), for our OLp r MD 220 Hemodiafilter and our DSU. We have not yet obtained a CE mark for any of our other products. We previously received clearance from the FDA to market our OLp r MD220 Hemodiafilter and OLp r H2H Module for use with a hemodialysis machine that provides ultrapure dialysate in accordance with current ANSI AAMI ISO standards, for the treatment of chronic renal failure patients. We have not begun to broadly market these products and are actively seeking a commercialization partner in the United States. We cannot ensure that any existing products that have not yet been approved, or any new products developed by us in the future, will be approved for marketing. The clearance and or approval processes can be lengthy and uncertain, and each requires substantial commitments of our financial resources and our management time and effort. We may not be able to obtain further CE marking or regulatory approval for any of our existing or new products in a timely manner or at all. Even if we do obtain regulatory approval, approval may be only for limited uses with specific classes of patients, processes or other devices. Our failure to obtain, or delays in obtaining, the necessary regulatory clearance and or approvals would prevent us from selling our affected products in the applicable regions. If we cannot sell some of our products in such regions, or if we are delayed in selling while waiting for the necessary clearance and or approvals, our ability to generate revenues from these products will be limited. Over time, we intend to market our products globally. Requirements pertaining to the sale of our products vary widely from country to country. It may be very expensive and difficult for us to meet the requirements for the sale of our products in many countries. As a result, we may not be able to obtain the required approvals in a timely manner, if at all. If we cannot sell our products in a particular region, then the size of our potential market could be reduced, which would limit our potential sales and revenues. Clinical studies that may be required for our products are costly and time consuming, and their outcome is uncertain. Before obtaining regulatory approvals for the commercial sale of any of our products, other than those for which we have already received marketing approval in the United States and elsewhere, we must demonstrate through clinical studies that our products are safe and effective. 21 For products other than those for which we have already received marketing approval, if we do not prove in clinical trials that our products are safe and effective, we will not obtain marketing approvals from the applicable regulatory authorities. In particular, 1 or more of our products may not exhibit the expected medical benefits, may cause harmful side effects, may not be effective in treating dialysis patients, or may have other unexpected characteristics that preclude regulatory approval for any or all indications of use or limit commercial use if approved. The length of time necessary to complete clinical trials varies significantly and is difficult to predict. Factors that can cause delay or termination of our clinical trials include slower than expected patient enrollment due to the nature of the protocol, the proximity of subjects to clinical sites, the eligibility criteria for the study, competition with clinical trials for similar devices or other factors; lower than expected retention rates of subjects in a clinical trial; inadequately trained or insufficient personnel at the study site to assist in overseeing and monitoring clinical trials; delays in approvals from a study site review board, or other required approvals; longer treatment time required to demonstrate effectiveness; lack of sufficient supplies of the product; adverse medical events or side effects in treated subjects; and lack of effectiveness of the product being tested. Even if we obtain positive results from clinical studies for our products, we may not achieve the same success in future studies of such products. Data obtained from clinical studies is susceptible to varying interpretations that could delay, limit or prevent regulatory approval. In addition, we may encounter delays or rejections based upon changes in regulatory policy for device approval during the period of product development and regulatory review of each submitted new device application. Moreover, regulatory approval may entail limitations on the indicated uses of the device. Failure to obtain requisite governmental approvals or failure to obtain approvals of the scope requested will delay or preclude our licensees or marketing partners from marketing our products or limit the commercial use of such products and will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, some or all of the clinical trials we undertake may not demonstrate sufficient safety and efficacy to obtain the requisite regulatory approvals, which could prevent or delay the creation of marketable products. Our product development costs will increase if we have delays in testing or approvals, if we need to perform more, larger or different clinical trials than planned or if our trials are not successful. Delays in our clinical trials may harm our financial results and the commercial prospects for our products. Additionally, we may be unable to complete our clinical trials if we are unable to obtain additional capital. We may be required to design and conduct additional clinical trials. We may be required to design and conduct additional clinical trials to further demonstrate the safety and efficacy of our products, which may result in significant expense and delay. Regulatory agencies may require new or additional clinical trials because of inconclusive results from current or earlier clinical trials, a possible failure to conduct clinical trials in complete adherence to certain regulatory standards, the identification of new clinical trial endpoints, or the need for additional data regarding the safety or efficacy of our products. Moreover, regulatory authorities may not ultimately approve our products for commercial sale in any jurisdiction, even if we believe future clinical results are positive. Significant additional governmental regulation could subject us to unanticipated delays that would adversely affect our sales and revenues. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to get our products into the market as quickly as possible. Additional laws and regulations, or changes to existing laws and regulations that are applicable to our business may be enacted or promulgated, and the interpretation, application or enforcement of the existing laws and regulations may change. We cannot predict the nature of any future laws, regulations, interpretations, applications or enforcements or the specific effects any of these might have on our business. Any future laws, regulations, interpretations, applications or enforcements could delay or prevent regulatory approval or clearance of our products and our ability to market our products. Moreover, changes that result in our failure to comply with the requirements of applicable laws and regulations could result in enforcement actions by the FDA and or other agencies, all of which could impair our ability to have manufactured and to sell the affected products. 22 Protecting our intellectual property in our technology through patents may be costly and ineffective. If we are not able to adequately secure or enforce protection of our intellectual property, then we may not be able to compete effectively and we may not be profitable. Our future success depends in part on our ability to protect the intellectual property for our technology through patents. We will only be able to protect our products and methods from unauthorized use by third parties to the extent that our products and methods are covered by valid and enforceable patents or are effectively maintained as trade secrets. Our 12 granted U.S. patents will expire at various times from 2020 to 2027, assuming they are properly maintained. The protection provided by our patents, and patent applications if issued, may not be broad enough to prevent competitors from introducing similar products into the market. Our patents, if challenged or if we attempt to enforce them, may not necessarily be upheld by the courts of any jurisdiction. Numerous publications may have been disclosed by, and numerous patents may have been issued to, our competitors and others relating to methods and devices for dialysis of which we are not aware and additional patents relating to methods and devices for dialysis may be issued to our competitors and others in the future. If any of those publications or patents conflict with our patent rights, or cover our products, then any or all of our patent applications could be rejected and any or all of our granted patents could be invalidated, either of which could materially adversely affect our competitive position. Litigation and other proceedings relating to patent matters, whether initiated by us or a third party, can be expensive and time consuming, regardless of whether the outcome is favorable to us, and may require the diversion of substantial financial, managerial and other resources. An adverse outcome could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties or require us to cease any related development, product sales or commercialization activities. In addition, if patents that contain dominating or conflicting claims have been or are subsequently issued to others and the claims of these patents are ultimately determined to be valid, then we may be required to obtain licenses under patents of others in order to develop, manufacture, use, import and or sell our products. We may not be able to obtain licenses under any of these patents on terms acceptable to us, if at all. If we do not obtain these licenses, we could encounter delays in, or be prevented entirely from using, importing, developing, manufacturing, offering or selling any products or practicing any methods, or delivering any services requiring such licenses. If we file for or obtain additional patents in foreign countries, we will be subject to laws and procedures that differ from those in the United States. Such differences could create additional uncertainty about the level and extent of our patent protection. Moreover, patent protection in foreign countries may be different from patent protection under U.S. laws and may not be as favorable to us. Many non U.S. jurisdictions, for example, prohibit patent claims covering methods of medical treatment of humans, although this prohibition may not include devices used for such treatment. If we are not able to secure and enforce protection of our trade secrets through enforcement of our confidentiality and non competition agreements, then our competitors may gain access to our trade secrets, we may not be able to compete effectively, and we may not be profitable. Such protection may be costly and ineffective. We attempt to protect our trade secrets, including the processes, concepts, ideas and documentation associated with our technologies, through the use of confidentiality agreements and non competition agreements with our current employees and with other parties to whom we have divulged such trade secrets. If these employees or other parties breach our confidentiality agreements and non competition agreements, or if these agreements are not sufficient to protect our technology or are found to be unenforceable, then our competitors could acquire and use information that we consider to be our trade secrets and we may not be able to compete effectively. Policing unauthorized use of our trade secrets is difficult and expensive and, in the event we further expand our operations, the laws of other countries may not adequately protect our trade secrets. 23 If we are not able to maintain sufficient quality controls, then the approval or clearance of our products by the European Union, the FDA or other relevant authorities could be withdrawn, delayed or denied and our sales and revenues will suffer. Approval or clearance of our products could be withdrawn, delayed or denied by the European Union, the FDA and the relevant authorities of other countries if our manufacturing facilities do not comply with their respective manufacturing requirements. The European Union imposes requirements on quality control systems of manufacturers, which are inspected and certified on a periodic basis and may be subject to additional unannounced inspections. Failure by our manufacturers to comply with these requirements could prevent us from marketing our products in the European Community. The FDA also imposes requirements through quality system requirements regulations, which include requirements for good manufacturing practices. Failure by our manufacturers to comply with these requirements could prevent us from obtaining FDA pre clearance or approval of our products and from marketing such products in the United States. Although the manufacturing facilities and processes that we use to manufacture our OLp r MD HDF filter series have been inspected and certified by a worldwide testing and certification agency (also referred to as a notified body) that performs conformity assessments to European Union requirements for medical devices, they have not been inspected by the FDA. A notified body is a group accredited and monitored by governmental agencies that inspects manufacturing facilities and quality control systems at regular intervals and is authorized to carry out unannounced inspections. We cannot be sure that any of the facilities or processes we use will comply or continue to comply with their respective requirements on a timely basis or at all, which could delay or prevent our obtaining the approvals we need to market our products in the European Community and the United States. To market our products in the European Community, the United States and other countries, where approved, manufacturers of such products must continue to comply or ensure compliance with the relevant manufacturing requirements. Although we cannot control the manufacturers of our products, we may need to expend time, resources and effort in product manufacturing and quality control to assist with their continued compliance with these requirements. If violations of applicable requirements are noted during periodic inspections of the manufacturing facilities of our manufacturers, then we may not be able to continue to market the products manufactured in such facilities and our revenues may be materially adversely affected. We may face significant risks associated with international operations, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We expect to manufacture and to market our products globally. Our international operations are subject to a number of risks, including the following fluctuations in exchange rates of the U.S. dollar could adversely affect our results of operations; we may face difficulties in enforcing and collecting accounts receivable under some countries legal systems; local regulations may restrict our ability to sell our products, have our products manufactured or conduct other operations; political instability could disrupt our operations; some governments and customers may have longer payment cycles, with resulting adverse effects on our cash flow; and some countries could impose additional taxes or restrict the import of our products. Any 1 or more of these factors could increase our costs, reduce our revenues, or disrupt our operations, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Risks Related to Owning Our Common Stock Our common stock could be further diluted as a result of the issuance of additional shares of common stock, warrants or options. In the past we have issued common stock and warrants in order to raise m1y. We have also issued stock options and restricted stock as compensation for services and incentive compensation for our employees, directors and consultants. We have shares of common stock reserved for issuance upon the exercise of certain of these securities and may increase the shares reserved for these purposes in the future. Our issuance of additional common stock, options and warrants could affect the rights of our stockholders, could reduce the market price of our common stock, or could obligate us to issue additional shares of common stock. Market sales of large amounts of our common stock, or the potential for those sales even if they do not actually occur, may have the effect of depressing the market price of our common stock, the supply of common stock available for resale could be increased which could stimulate trading activity and cause the market price of our common stock to drop, even if our business is doing well. Furthermore, the issuance of any additional shares of our common stock or securities convertible into our common stock could be substantially dilutive to holders of our common stock if they do not invest in future offerings. 24 The prices at which shares of the common stock trade have been and will likely continue to be volatile. During the 2 years ended December 31, 2019, our common stock has traded at prices ranging from a high of $1135 to a low of $342 per share. Due to the lack of an active trading market for our common stock, we expect the prices at which our common stock might trade to continue to be highly volatile. The expected volatile price of our stock will make it difficult for investors to predict the value of an investment in our common stock, to sell shares at a profit at any given time, or to plan purchases and sales in advance. A variety of other factors might also affect the market price of our common stock. These include, but are not limited to achievement or rejection of regulatory approvals by our competitors or us; publicity regarding actual or potential clinical or regulatory results relating to products under development by our competitors or us; delays or failures in initiating, completing or analyzing clinical trials or the unsatisfactory design or results of these trials; announcements of technological innovations or new commercial products by our competitors or us; developments concerning proprietary rights, including patents; regulatory developments in the United States and foreign countries; economic or other crises and other external factors; period to period fluctuations in our results of operations; threatened or actual litigation; changes in financial estimates by securities analysts; and sales of our common stock. We are not able to control many of these factors, and we believe that period to period comparisons of our financial results will not necessarily be indicative of our future performance. We have never paid dividends and do not intend to pay cash dividends. We have never paid dividends on our common stock and currently do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future. Consequently, any returns on an investment in our common stock in the foreseeable future will have to come from an increase in the value of the stock itself. As noted above, the lack of an active trading market for our common stock will make it difficult to value and sell our common stock. While our dividend policy will be based on the operating results and capital needs of our business, we anticipate that all earnings, if any, will be retained to finance our future operations. Several provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, and our second amended and restated bylaws could discourage, delay or prevent a merger or acquisition, which could adversely affect the market price of our common stock. Several provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, and our second amended and restated bylaws could discourage, delay or prevent a merger or acquisition that stockholders may consider favorable, and the market price of our common stock could be reduced as a result. These provisions include authorizing our board of directors to issue blank check preferred stock without stockholder approval; providing for a classified board of directors with staggered, 3 year terms; prohibiting us from engaging in a business combination with an interested stockholder for a period of 3 years after the date of the transaction in which the person became an interested stockholder unless certain provisions are met; prohibiting cumulative voting in the election of directors; limiting the persons who may call special meetings of stockholders; and establishing advance notice requirements for nominations for election to our board of directors or for proposing matters that can be acted on by stockholders at stockholder meetings. 25 As a smaller reporting company with little or no name recognition and with several risks and uncertainties that could impair our business operations, we are not likely to generate widespread interest in our common stock. Without widespread interest in our common stock, our common stock price may be highly volatile and an investment in our common stock could decline in value. Unlike many companies with publicly traded securities, we have little or no name recognition in the investment community. We are a relatively new company and very few investors are familiar with either our company or our products. We do not have an active trading market in our common stock, and 1 might never develop, or if it does develop, might not continue. Additionally, the market price of our common stock may fluctuate significantly in response to many factors, many of which are beyond our control. Risks and uncertainties, including those described elsewhere in this Risk Factors section could impair our business operations or otherwise cause our operating results or prospects to be below expectations of investors and market analysts, which could adversely affect the market price of our common stock. As a result, investors in our common stock may not be able to resell their shares at or above their purchase price and could lose all of their investment. Securities class action litigation is often brought against public companies following periods of volatility in the market price of such company securities. We may become subject to this type of litigation in the future. Litigation of this type could be extremely expensive and divert management attention and resources from running our company. Our directors, executive officers and Lambda Investors LLC ( Lambda ) control a significant portion of our stock and, if they choose to vote together, could have sufficient voting power to control the vote on substantially all corporate matters. As of February 20, 2020, Lambda, our largest stockholder, beneficially owned approximately 39% of our outstanding common stock. Collectively, Lambda, our directors and our executive officers beneficially owned approximately 45% of our outstanding common stock. As a result of this ownership, Lambda has the ability to exert significant influence over our policies and affairs, including the election of directors. Lambda, whether acting al1 or acting with other stockholders, could have the power to elect all of our directors and to control the vote on substantially all other corporate matters without the approval of other stockholders. Furthermore, such concentration of voting power could enable Lambda, whether acting al1 or acting with other stockholders, to delay or prevent another party from taking control of our company even where such change of control transaction might be desirable to other stockholders. The interests of Lambda in any matter put before the stockholders may differ from those of any other stockholder. Future sales of our common stock could cause the market price of our common stock to decline. The market price of our common stock could decline due to sales of a large number of shares in the market, including sales of shares by Lambda or any other large stockholder, or the perception that such sales could occur. These sales could also make it more difficult or impossible for us to sell equity securities in the future at a time and price that we deem appropriate to raise funds through future offerings of common stock. Future sales of our common stock by stockholders could depress the market price of our common stock. 26 Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments Not required.
